Maryland, session 2025, HB0967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the 2025 Edition of the Somerset County Code of Public Local Laws and any
supplement to the 2025 Edition of the Somerset County Code of Public Local Laws, to the
extent to which that code or supplement contains laws enacted by the General Assembly of
Maryland, is legalized. The 2025 Edition of the Somerset County Code of Public Local Laws
and any supplement shall be deemed and taken in all the courts of the State and by all
public officials of the State and its political subdivisions to be evidence of the law enacted
by the General Assembly contained in the code or a supplement to it.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 1 –